Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-3418
Team coordinator; duties.

(1) The team coordinator selected under section 71-3416 shall (a) convene and lead meetings of the team and (b) ensure the team provides recommendations to prevent domestic abuse deaths.

(2) The team coordinator shall (a) gather, store, and distribute the necessary records and information for investigations made available to the team, (b) ensure timely notification of the team members of upcoming meetings, (c) ensure that all team reporting and data collection requirements are met, (d) oversee adherence to the review process established by the Domestic Abuse Death Review Act and the protocols developed by the team, and (e) perform such other duties as the team deems appropriate.

Laws 2022, LB741, § 43.